Illinois, session 104th, SB3315.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-2b as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-2b)7    Sec. 5-2b. Medically fragile and technology dependent 8children eligibility and program; provider reimbursement 9rates. 10    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law except as 11provided in Section 5-30a, on and after September 1, 2012, 12subject to federal approval, medical assistance under this 13Article shall be available to children who qualify as persons 14with a disability, as defined under the federal Supplemental 15Security Income program and who are medically fragile and 16technology dependent. The program shall allow eligible 17children to receive the medical assistance provided under this 18Article in the community and must maximize, to the fullest 19extent permissible under federal law, federal reimbursement 20and family cost-sharing, including co-pays, premiums, or any 21other family contributions, except that the Department shall 22be permitted to incentivize the utilization of selected 23services through the use of cost-sharing adjustments. The   SB3315- 2 -LRB104 17706 KTG 31137 b1Department shall establish the policies, procedures, 2standards, services, and criteria for this program by rule.3    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 4subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2024, the 5reimbursement rates for nursing paid through Nursing and 6Personal Care Services for non-waiver customers and to 7providers of private duty nursing services for children 8eligible for medical assistance under this Section shall be 920% higher than the reimbursement rates in effect for nursing 10services on December 31, 2023. 11    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 12subject to federal approval, on and after January 1, 2025, the 13reimbursement rates for nursing paid through Nursing and 14Personal Care Services for non-waiver customers and to 15providers of private duty nursing services for children 16eligible for medical assistance under this Section shall be 7% 17higher than the reimbursement rates in effect for nursing 18services on December 31, 2024. 19    (c-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, 20subject to federal approval, on and after July 1, 2026 the 21reimbursement rates paid to providers of private duty nursing 22services for children eligible for medical assistance under 23this Section shall be 25% higher than the reimbursement rates 24in effect for nursing services on June 30, 2026. 25    (d) The Department shall conduct an evaluation to study 26the program, including service provision and design, waiver   SB3315- 3 -LRB104 17706 KTG 31137 b1operations, and methodologies and policies for setting rates 2and reimbursements for services and supports that are provided 3to (i) individuals under the age of 21 who are approved by the 4Department for in-home shift nursing services and (ii) 5individuals over the age of 21 who are receiving in-home shift 6nursing services under the Home and Community-Based Services 7Waiver for Medically Fragile and Technology Dependent 8Children, including, but not limited to, in-home shift nursing 9services and related home and community-based services and 10supports, made to nursing agencies for such services. As 11needed, the Department shall consult with Department-enrolled 12providers of in-home shift nursing services to ensure accurate 13information is considered in the evaluation, and the 14Department may, to the extent it deems necessary and 15appropriate, contract with an outside entity to assist or 16provide further analysis in the support of the evaluation. 17(Source: P.A. 103-102, eff. 1-1-24; 103-593, eff. 6-7-24; 18104-9, eff. 6-16-25.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 202026.